Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB24.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 304.47-010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this subtitle[ 47 of this chapter], unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Criminal syndicate" means five (5) or more persons collaborating to promote or engage in any fraudulent
insurance act, as set forth in subsection (1) of Section 2 of this Act, on a continuing basis;
(2) "Division" means the Division of Insurance Fraud Investigation of the Kentucky Department of Insurance,
its employees, or authorized representatives;
(3) "Insurance policy" or "policy" means any individual or group policy, including those defined by KRS
Chapter 342, certificate, or contract of an insurer, including reinsurance affecting the rights of any
Kentucky resident or bearing a reasonable relation to Kentucky regardless of whether delivered or issued
for delivery in Kentucky;
(4) "Insured" means any person who is a named insured or beneficiary under an insurance policy or a person
who is not a named insured or beneficiary under an insurance policy due to the fraudulent action of
another, but who in good faith believes himself or herself to be an insured or beneficiary;
(5) "Insurer" means any person, entity, organization, or reinsurer, including fraternal benefit societies as defined in
Subtitle 29 of this chapter, nonprofit hospital, medical-surgical, dental, and health service corporation as
defined in Subtitle 32 of this chapter, health maintenance organization as defined in Subtitle 38 of this chapter,
prepaid dental plan organization as defined in Subtitle 43 of this chapter, or unauthorized insurer as defined in
Subtitle 11 of this chapter, subject to regulation by or registration with the Department of Insurance under this
chapter, and any "carrier," "self-insurer," or "insurance carrier" as defined by KRS Chapter 342;[
(2) "Insurance policy" or "policy" means any individual or group policy, including those defined by KRS Chapter
342, certificate, or contract of an insurer as defined in subsection (1) of this section including reinsurance
affecting the rights of any Kentucky resident or bearing a reasonable relation to Kentucky regardless of
whether delivered or issued for delivery in Kentucky;
(3) "Insured" means any person who is a named insured or beneficiary under a policy as defined in subsection (2)
of this section or a person who is not a named insured or beneficiary under a policy due to the fraudulent
action of another, but who in good faith believes himself or herself to be an insured or beneficiary;]
(6)[(4)] "Law enforcement agency" means any federal, state, county, or consolidated police or law enforcement
department and any prosecuting official of the federal, state, county, local, or consolidated government; and
(7)[(5)] "Statement" includes[,] but is not limited to[,] any notice, statement, proof of loss, bill of lading,
invoice, account, estimate of property or casualty damages, bid or proposal relating to property or casualty
damages, bill for services, diagnosis, prescription, hospital or physician record or report, X-ray, test result, or
other evidence of loss, injury, or expense that is[. A statement may be] in any form, including oral, written,
and electronic transmissions[;
(6) "Division" means the Division of Insurance Fraud Investigation of the Kentucky Department of Insurance, its
employees, or authorized representatives; and
(7) "Criminal syndicate" means five (5) or more persons collaborating to promote or engage in any fraudulent
insurance act, as set forth in KRS 304.47-020(1), on a continuing basis].
Section 2. KRS 304.47-020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this subtitle, a person or entity commits a "fraudulent insurance act" if he or she engages in
any of the following, including but not limited to matters relating to workers' compensation:
(a) Knowingly and with intent to defraud or deceive presents, causes to be presented, or prepares with
knowledge or belief that it will be presented to an insurer, Board of Claims, Special Fund, or any agent
thereof:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
1. Any written or oral statement as part of, or in support of, a claim for payment or other benefit
pursuant to an insurance policy or from a "self-insurer" as defined by KRS Chapter 342,
knowing that the statement contains any false, incomplete, or misleading information concerning
any fact or thing material to a claim;[ or]
2. To the extent not otherwise included under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph, any statement
that misrepresents the scope of damages, including repair costs and other expenses, associated
with a property, casualty, or property and casualty insurance claim, including any claim for
towing or storage benefits under a property, casualty, or property and casualty insurance
policy, except this subparagraph shall not apply to offers or counteroffers by legal counsel
representing a plaintiff or defendant in a disputed claim involving bodily injury; or
3.[2.] Any statement as part of, or in support of, an application for an insurance policy, for renewal,
reinstatement, or replacement of insurance, or in support of an application to a lender for money
to pay a premium, knowing that the statement contains any false, incomplete, or misleading
information concerning any fact or thing material to the application;
(b) Knowingly and willfully transacts any contract, agreement, or instrument which violates this title;
(c) Knowingly and with intent to defraud or deceive:
1. Receives money for the purpose of purchasing insurance, and fails to obtain insurance;
2. Fails to make payment or disposition of money or voucher as defined in KRS 304.17A-750, as
required by agreement or legal obligation, that comes into his or her possession while acting as a
licensee under this chapter;
3. Presents, causes to be presented, or prepares with knowledge or belief that it will be presented to
or by an insurer, or to the commissioner, any statement, knowing that the statement contains any
false, incomplete, or misleading information concerning any material fact or thing, as part of, or
in support of one (1) or more of the following:
a. The rating of an insurance policy;
b. The financial condition of an insurer;
c. The formation, acquisition, merger, reconsolidation, dissolution, or withdrawal from one
(1) or more lines of insurance in all or part of this Commonwealth by an insurer; or
d. A document filed with the commissioner; or
4. Engages in any of the following:
a. Solicitation or acceptance of new or renewal insurance risks on behalf of an insolvent
insurer; or
b. Removal, concealment, alteration, tampering, or destruction of money, records, or any
other property or assets of an insurer;
(d) Issues or knowingly presents fake or counterfeit insurance policies, certificates of insurance, insurance
identification cards, insurance binders, or any other documents that purport to evidence insurance;
(e) Makes any false or fraudulent representation as to the death or disability of a policy or certificate holder
in any written statement or certificate for the purpose of fraudulently obtaining money or benefit from
an insurer;
(f) Engages in unauthorized insurance, as set forth in KRS 304.11-030; or
(g) Assists, abets, solicits, or conspires with another to commit a fraudulent insurance act in violation of
this subtitle.
(2) A person convicted of a violation of subsection (1) of this section shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor,
unless the aggregate of the claim, benefit, or money referred to in subsection (1) of this section is:
(a) Five hundred dollars ($500) or more but less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), in which case it is a
Class D felony;
(b) Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more but less than one million dollars ($1,000,000), in which case it
is a Class C felony; or

CHAPTER 25 3
(c) One million dollars ($1,000,000) or more, in which case it is a Class B felony.
(3) A person, with the purpose to establish or maintain a criminal syndicate or to facilitate any of its activities,
shall be guilty of engaging in organized crime, a Class B felony, if he or she engages in any of the activities set
forth in KRS 506.120(1).
(4) A person convicted of a crime established in this section shall be punished by:
(a) Imprisonment for a term:
1. Not to exceed the period set forth in KRS 532.090 if the crime is a Class A misdemeanor; or
2. Within the periods set forth in KRS 532.060 if the crime is a Class D, C, or B felony;
(b) A fine, per occurrence, of:
1. For a misdemeanor, not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) per individual nor five
thousand dollars ($5,000) per corporation or twice the amount of gain received as a result of the
violation, whichever is greater; or
2. For a felony, not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per individual nor one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000) per corporation, or twice the amount of gain received as a result of
the violation; whichever is greater; or
(c) Both imprisonment and a fine, as set forth in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(5) (a) In addition to imprisonment, the assessment of a fine, or both, a person convicted of a crime established
in this section may be ordered to make restitution to any victim who suffered a monetary loss due to any
actions by that person which resulted in the adjudication of guilt, and to the division for the cost of any
investigation.
(b) The amount of restitution shall equal the monetary value of the actual loss or twice the amount of gain
received as a result of the violation, whichever is greater.
(6) Any person damaged as a result of a violation of any provision of this section shall have a cause of action to
recover compensatory damages, plus all reasonable investigation and litigation expenses, including attorneys'
fees, at the trial and appellate courts.
(7) (a) The provisions of this section shall also apply to any agent, unauthorized insurer or its agents or
representatives, or surplus lines carrier who, with intent, injures, defrauds, or deceives any claimant
with regard to any claim.
(b) The claimant shall have the right to recover the damages provided in subsection (6) of this section.
Signed by Governor March 18, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version